Maine, session 132, LD1674.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA c. 101 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 101
INSURING OUR COMMUNITIES ACT
§7801. Short title
This Act may be known and cited as "the Insuring Our Communities Act."
§7802. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. New fossil fuel project. "New fossil fuel project" means a project designed to
facilitate the production of fossil fuels in excess of what is in development as of September
15, 2025, including production of new coal infrastructure, power plants or mines. "New
fossil fuel project" includes projects that support exploring new oil and gas fields or
otherwise expanding oil and gas reserves; examples of such projects include, but are not
limited to, the construction of new wells, pipelines, terminals or gas power plants.
2. Precautionary principle. "Precautionary principle" means an approach taken to
regulation that mandates that, when activities under consideration may lead to unacceptably
serious or irreversible harm that is scientifically plausible but uncertain, actions must be
taken to avoid or diminish that harm.
3. Reporting year. "Reporting year" means a 12-month period of time for which a
company reports its financial performance.
§7803. Climate risk mitigation for insurers
1. Precautionary principle; new fossil fuel project underwriting restrictions. The
bureau shall:
A. Integrate the precautionary principle into its regulation and supervision of insurers
by:
(1) Incorporating measures to anticipate, prevent or minimize the effects of climate
risk and its adverse effects; and
(2) Implementing cost-effective measures to address the climate risk exposure of
insurers, even in the absence of full economic or scientific certainty;
B. Require insurers, as a condition of doing business in the State, to annually submit
a report on their progress on plans to align their investment and underwriting activities
with science-based climate risk mitigation targets that are based on absolute
greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets and do not rely on carbon offsets or
unproven technology;
C. Require insurers to annually submit a commitment to not invest or underwrite new
fossil fuel projects; and
Page 1 - 132LR1810(01)

D. Align insurer investment and underwriting activities with science-based climate
risk mitigation targets by prohibiting underwriting for any new fossil fuel project and
directing insurers to phase out existing underwriting for exploration, extraction,
processing, exporting and transporting and any other significant action with respect to
oil, natural gas, coal or any byproduct thereof.
2. Investments and underwriting reporting. No later than September 15, 2026 and
annually thereafter, insurers subject to the requirements of this section pursuant to
subsection 4 shall submit a report to the bureau disclosing the information required under
this subsection for the preceding reporting year. The report must disclose:
A. The insurer's investments in:
(1) Any company that derives 10% or more of its revenue from exploration,
extraction, processing, exporting, transporting and any other significant action with
respect to oil, natural gas, coal or any byproduct thereof;
(2) Any project intended to facilitate or expand exploration, extraction, processing,
exporting, transporting and any other significant action with respect to oil, natural
gas, coal or any byproduct thereof; and
(3) Any project intended to construct any infrastructure related to projects
described under subparagraph (2), such as wells, pipelines, terminals and
refineries;
B. The greenhouse gas emissions associated with insurers' financing and investment
activities from all of the insurer's investments;
C. The insurer's gross premium underwriting for:
(1) Any company that derives 10% or more of its revenue from exploration,
extraction, processing, exporting, transporting and any other significant action with
respect to oil, natural gas, coal or any byproduct thereof;
(2) Any project intended to facilitate or expand exploration, extraction, processing,
exporting, transporting and any other significant action with respect to oil, natural
gas, coal or any byproduct thereof; and
(3) Any project intended to construct any infrastructure related to projects
described under subparagraph (2), such as wells, pipelines, terminals and
refineries;
D. The greenhouse gas emissions associated with the insurer's issuance of insurance
or reinsurance policies from all of the insurer's underwriting; and
E. Any other information the bureau considers necessary to effectively implement and
enforce any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter.
The superintendent shall develop and implement criteria for reporting under this subsection
that enable the superintendent to post the information reported pursuant to this subsection
on the bureau's publicly accessible website.
Within 3 months of receiving a report required pursuant to this subsection, the
superintendent shall compile and post the information in the report on the bureau's publicly
accessible website.
Page 2 - 132LR1810(01)

3. Consultants. The superintendent may engage the services of attorneys, actuaries,
accountants and other experts not otherwise a part of the superintendent's staff, at the
reporting insurer's expense, as is reasonably necessary to assist in the review of an insurer's
report submitted pursuant to subsection 2. A person engaged pursuant to this subsection
must be under the direction and control of the superintendent and must act in a purely
advisory capacity.
4. Application. The superintendent shall subject an insurer to the requirements of this
section if:
A. The insurer reports over $10,000,000 of direct premiums written in the State on its
annual filing of the so-called Schedule T form, or successor form, with the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners;
B. The insurer's activities or investments may expose the insurer to a heightened level
of risk due to climate change; or
C. The superintendent otherwise determines that disclosure is in the public interest.
§7804. Divestiture
No later than September 15, 2030, the superintendent shall require any insurer doing
business in the State to certify that the insurer has divested from:
1. Fossil fuel revenue. Any company that derives 10% or more of its revenue from
exploration, extraction, processing, exporting, transporting and any other significant action
with respect to oil, natural gas, coal or any byproduct thereof;
2. Fossil fuel projects. Any project intended to facilitate or expand exploration,
extraction, processing, exporting, transporting and any other significant action with respect
to oil, natural gas, coal or any byproduct thereof; and
3. Infrastructure projects. Any project intended to construct any infrastructure
related to projects under subsection 2, such as wells, pipelines, terminals or refineries.
§7805. Reporting
No later than September 15, 2026, and once every 2 years thereafter, the superintendent
shall submit a report to the Legislature and the Governor pursuant to this subsection. The
initial report must disclose for the preceding calendar year, and the biennial report must
disclose for the preceding 2 calendar years:
1. Efforts to implement this chapter. The bureau's efforts to implement this chapter;
2. Regulatory and supervisory actions taken. The bureau's regulatory and
supervisory actions taken, if any, to bolster the resilience of insurers to the physical effects
of climate change;
3. Affordability and availability of insurance for disadvantaged communities.
The effects, if any, that the insurers' efforts to address climate risk have had on the
affordability and availability of insurance for disadvantaged communities;
4. Readiness for climate change and energy transition. Insurers' and the insurance
market's readiness for climate change and any related energy transition;
5. Major sources of climate risk. Major sources of climate risk faced by the insurers;
Page 3 - 132LR1810(01)

6. Gaps to address. Any gaps in insurers' response to climate risk that the bureau
intends to address; and
7. Legislative action. Any legislative action that must be taken in order to allow the
bureau to address climate risk.
The report must be made available to the public and posted on the bureau's publicly
accessible website.
The report must include the bureau's planned regulatory and supervisory actions, if any,
to bolster the resilience of insurers to the physical effects of climate change.
§7806. Rules
The superintendent may adopt rules to implement this chapter. Rules adopted pursuant
to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.